nl: Zelfhardende klei afwerking: Krijtachtig; Glanzend; Mat; Natuurlijk/aards; Satijn; Steenachtig; Overig
sl-SI: Končni izgled samozapiralne gline: Kredasto; Sijaj; Mat; Naravno/zemeljsko; Saten; Podobno kamnu; Drugo
da: Selvhærdende lerfinish: Kridtagtig; Blank; Mat; Naturlig/jordagtig; Satin; Stenagtig; Andet
hr-HR: Samostvrdnjavajuća glinena završna obrada: Kredasto; Sjajno; Matirano; Prirodno / zemljano; Saten; Poput kamena; Ostalo
sv: Självhärdande lerfinish: Kritig; Blank; Matt; Naturlig/jordig; Satin; Stenliknande; Övrigt
el: Φινίρισμα αυτοσκληρυνόμενου πηλού: Με υφή κιμωλίας; Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Φυσικό/γήινο; Σατινέ; Με όψη πέτρας; Άλλο
zh-TW: 自硬性黏土表面處理: 粉質; 亮面; 霧面; 自然/泥土質感; 緞面; 仿石感; 其他
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava samotvrdnúcej hliny: Kriedový; Lesklý; Matný; Prírodný/zemitý; Saténový; Kamenný vzhľad; Iné
th: ผิวเคลือบดินเหนียวแข็งตัวได้เอง: เนื้อชอล์ก; เงา; ด้าน; ธรรมชาติ/สีเอิร์ธโทน; ซาติน; คล้ายหิน; อื่นๆ
ja: 自己硬化粘土仕上げ: チョーク調; 光沢; マット; ナチュラル/アース調; サテン; ストーン調; その他
lt-LT: Savaime kietėjančio molio apdaila: Kreidinis; Blizgus; Matinis; Natūralus / žemiškas; Satininis; Panašus į akmenį; Kita
cs: Samotvrdnoucí jílový povrch: Křídový; Lesklý; Matný; Přírodní/zemitý; Saténový; Jako kámen; Jiné
ro-RO: Finisaj al argilei cu uscare la aer: Aspect de cretă; Lucios; Mat; Natural/pământiu; Satinat; Aspect de piatră; Altele
en: Self-hardening clay finish: Chalky; Gloss; Matte; Natural/earthy; Satin; Stone-like; Other
hu: Levegőn száradó agyag felülete: Krétás; Fényes; Matt; Természetes / Földes; Szatén; Kőszerű; Egyéb
ko: 자연 경화 점토 마감: 초크 질감; 유광; 무광; 자연스러움/어시; 새틴; 돌 질감; 기타
de: Oberflächenfinish des selbsthärtenden Tons: Kreidig; Glänzend; Matt; Natürlich/Erdbraun; Seidenmatt; Steinartig; Andere
fi: Itsekovettuva savipinta: Liitumainen; Kiiltävä; Matta; Luonnollinen/maanläheinen; Satiini; Kivimäinen; Muu
bg-BG: Финиш на самовтвърдяваща се глина: Тебеширен; Гланц; Мат; Естествен/земен; Сатен; Като камък; Друго
pt-PT: Acabamento em argila autoendurecível: Com aspeto de giz; Brilhante; Mate; Natural/terroso; Acetinado; Tipo pedra; Outro
it: Finitura dell'argilla autoindurente: Gessoso; Lucido; Opaco; Naturale/Terra; Satinato; Effetto pietra; Altro
pt-BR: Argila autoendurecível acabamento: Gredoso; Brilhante; Fosco; Natural/terroso; Acetinado; Tipo pedra; Outro
fr: Finition de l’argile autodurcissante: Crayeux; Brillant; Mat; Naturel/terreux; Satiné; Aspect pierre; Autre
zh-CN: 自硬粘土成品表面效果: 粉感质地; 光泽; 哑光; 自然/泥土感; 缎面; 仿石质感; 其他
nb: Selvherdende leirebelegg: Kalkaktig; Blank; Matt; Naturlig/jordaktig; Sateng; Steinaktig; Annet
es: Acabado de arcilla autoendurecible: Calcáreo; Brillante; Mate; Natural/terroso; Satinado; Símil piedra; Otro
pl: Samoutwardzalna glina wykończeniowa: Kredowe; Błyszczące; Matowe; Naturalne/ziemiste; Satynowe; Kamieniopodobne; Inne
tr: Kendiliğinden sertleşen kil yüzey bitişi: Kireçsi (Tebeşirimsi); Parlak; Mat; Doğal/toprak; Saten; Taş görünümlü; Diğer
vi: Lớp phủ đất sét tự khô: Dạng phấn; Bóng; Nhám; Tự nhiên/màu đất; Bóng mờ; Giống đá; Khác
ru: Отделка самозатвердевающей глины: Меловая; Глянцевая; Матовая; Естественная/землистая; Сатиновая; Под камень; Другое